South Dakota, session 2026, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
There are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and from the
computation of the amount of tax imposed by it, the gross receipts from the sale of any
fresh seasonal fruits and vegetables, meat, eggs, dairy, or baked goods, flowers, or
artisanal products, directly to consumers, at a farmers' market in this state.
For purposes of this section, "farmers' market" means a public, recurring
marketplace where multiple independent producers, primarily farmers, sell agricultural
products directly to consumers.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.